Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Chapter 5

Insolvent Estates

30-5-101. Initiation of administration.

The administration of an insolvent estate shall begin upon the filing of a petition to probate or the application for letters of administration by the personal representative or a creditor in the court having probate jurisdiction.

Code 1858, § 2362 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 283, § 21); 1871, ch. 106, § 1; Shan., § 4102; mod. Code 1932, § 8298; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-701; Acts 1989, ch. 516, § 1.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 121, 432.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 45, 767, 892, 896, 898.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

30-5-102. Notice of insolvency — Filing — Copies.

After the time for filing claims has expired, as provided by § 30-2-310, if the estate is unable to pay all of its creditors, the personal representative shall file with the clerk a notice of insolvency. A copy of the notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each creditor who has filed a claim. This notice may be mailed to creditors by the attorney for the estate, the personal representative or, if requested, by the clerk.

Code 1858, § 2328 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 283, § 4); Shan., § 4068; mod. Code 1932, § 8264; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-702; Acts 1989, ch. 516, § 2.

Cross-References. Sale of real estate to pay estate debts, expenses and taxes, § 30-2-418.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 767, 897.

30-5-103. Notice of insolvency — Contents — Effect of no objections.

The notice of insolvency shall contain an accounting of assets that have come into the hands of the personal representative and a proposed plan of distribution in accordance with § 30-2-317.

The notice shall bear, in a conspicuous manner, the following language: Objections to this proposed plan of distribution must be filed with the clerk within thirty (30) days from the date of receipt of this notice.

If no objections are filed within the thirty-day waiting period, the personal representative may execute the proposed plan of distribution and close the estate, relieving the personal representative of any further liability to the estate.

Code 1858, § 2329 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 283, § 5); Shan., § 4069; mod. Code 1932, § 8265; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-703; Acts 1989, ch. 516, § 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 897.

30-5-104. Hearing on objection to plan — Notice.

If an objection to the proposed plan of distribution is filed with the clerk within the thirty-day waiting period, the clerk shall schedule a hearing no less than fifteen (15) nor more than thirty (30) days from the last day upon which objections may be filed.

The clerk shall give notice of the hearing date to the attorney for the estate, to the personal representative, to the creditor filing the objection, and to all claiming creditors.

Code 1858, § 2330 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 283, § 6); Shan., § 4070; mod. Code 1932, § 8266; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-704; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 25; 1989, ch. 516, § 4; 1997, ch. 407, § 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 897.

Law Reviews.

In Rem Actions — Adequacy of Notice. 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 495 (1958).

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

30-5-105. Clerk's report — Exceptions.

Within ten (10) days of a hearing required under § 30-5-104, the clerk shall file a report to the court setting forth the clerk's findings.

If no exceptions are filed with the clerk, the clerk's report shall become the judgment of the court.

If an exception to the report is filed, the matter shall be determined by the court.

Upon final determination of an objection to a plan of distribution, distribution shall be made and the estate closed.

Code 1858, § 2355 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 283, § 18); Shan., § 4095; mod. Code 1932, § 8291; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1(37); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-705; Acts 1989, ch. 516, § 5.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees, §§ 8-21-401 and 8-21-701.